Hawaii statutes.
[§199D-2] Applicability. Notwithstanding
any other provision of law to the contrary, all natural resource infractions
that the department identifies as subject to administrative penalties may be
adjudicated pursuant to this chapter. This chapter may be applied by all of
the divisions of the department. [L 2004, c 142, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next